Utah statutes.
70A-3-113.   Date of instrument.
(1)  An instrument may be antedated or postdated.  The date stated determines
the time of payment if the instrument is payable at a fixed period after the
date.  Except as provided in Subsection 70A-4-401 (3), an instrument payable
on demand is not payable before the date of the instrument.
(2)  If an instrument is undated, its date is the date of its issue or, in the
case of an unissued instrument, the date it first comes into possession of a
holder.
